Utah statutes.
19-6-821.   Violations -- Civil proceedings and penalties -- Orders.
(1)  A person who violates any provision of this part or any order, permit,
plan approval, or rule issued or adopted under this part is subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $10,000 per day for each day of violation as
determined in a civil hearing under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, except:
(a)  any violation of Subsection 19-6-804(1) or (3), regarding landfills, is
subject to the penalty under Subsection 19-6-804(4) rather than the penalties
under this section; and
(b)  any violation of Subsection 19-6-808(1), (2), or (3) regarding payment of
the recycling fee by the tire retailer is subject to penalties as provided in
Subsection 19-6-808(4) rather than the penalties under this section.
(2)  The board may bring an action in the name of the state to restrain a
person from continuing a violation of this part and to require the person to
perform necessary remediation regarding a violation of this part.
(3)  When the executive secretary finds a situation exists in violation of
this part that presents an immediate threat to the public health or welfare,
the executive secretary may issue an emergency order under Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(4)  The executive secretary may revoke the registration of a waste tire
recycler or transporter who violates any provision of this part or any order,
plan approval, permit, or rule issued or adopted under this part.
(5)  The executive secretary may revoke the tire storage permit for a storage
facility that is in violation of any provision of this part or any order, plan
approval, permit, or rule issued or adopted under this part.
(6)  If a person has been convicted of violating a provision of this part
prior to a finding by the executive secretary of a violation of the same
provision in an administrative hearing, the executive secretary may not assess
a civil monetary penalty under this section for the same offense for which the
conviction was obtained.
(7)  All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the
fund.
